Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1506.01
Financial institution, defined.

For purposes of sections 8-1506 to 8-1510, financial institution shall mean a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, building and loan association, trust company, or credit union, organized under the laws of this state or organized under the laws of the United States to do business in this state.

Laws 1990, LB 956, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 15.